Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE D. CRUSTACEANS AND MOLLUSKS

CHAPTER 77. SHRIMP

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 77.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Coastal water" means all the salt water of this state, including that portion of the Gulf of Mexico within the jurisdiction of the state.

(2) "Inside water" means all bays, inlets, outlets, passes, rivers, streams, and other bodies of water landward from the shoreline of the state along the Gulf of Mexico and contiguous to, or connected with, but not a part of, the Gulf of Mexico and within which the tide regularly rises and falls and in which saltwater shrimp are found or into which saltwater shrimp migrate.

(3) "Outside water" means the salt water of the state contiguous to and seaward from the shoreline of the state along the Gulf of Mexico as the shoreline is projected and extended in a continuous and unbroken line, following the contours of the shoreline, across bays, inlets, outlets, passes, rivers, streams, and other bodies of water; and that portion of the Gulf of Mexico extending from the shoreline seaward and within the jurisdiction of the state.

(4) "Major bays" means the deeper, major bay areas of the inside water, including Sabine Lake north of Cameron Causeway, Trinity Bay, Galveston Bay, East Galveston Bay, West Galveston Bay, Matagorda Bay (including East Matagorda Bay), Tres Palacios Bay south of a line from Grassy Point to the mouth of Pilkerton Bayou, Espiritu Santo Bay, Lavaca Bay seaward of State Highway 35, San Antonio Bay seaward of a line from McDowell Point to Grassy Point to Marker 32 on the Victoria Barge Canal, Ayres Bay, Carlos Bay, Aransas Bay, Mesquite Bay, and Corpus Christi Bay, all exclusive of tributary bays, bayous, and inlets, lakes, and rivers.

(5) "Possess" means the act of having in possession or control, keeping, detaining, restraining, or holding as owner, or under a fishing ley, or as agent, bailee, or custodian of another.

(6) "Commercial gulf shrimp boat" means any boat that is required to be numbered or registered under the laws of the United States or of this state and that is used for the purpose of catching or assisting in catching shrimp and other edible aquatic products from the outside water of the state for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, or exchange, or from salt water outside the state for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, or exchange, and that unloads at a port or other point in the state without having been previously unloaded in another state or foreign country.

(7) "Commercial bay shrimp boat" means a boat that is required to be numbered or registered under the laws of the United States or this state and that is used for the purpose of catching or assisting in catching shrimp and other edible aquatic products from the inside water of this state for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, or exchange.

(8) "Commercial bait shrimp boat" means a boat that is required to be numbered or registered under the laws of the United States or of this state and that is used for the purpose of catching or assisting in catching shrimp for use as bait and other edible aquatic products from the inside water of the state for pay or for the purpose of sale, barter, or exchange.

(9) Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 130, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

(10) "Bait-shrimp dealer" means a person who operates an established place of business in a coastal county of the state for compensation or profit for the purpose of handling shrimp caught for use as bait from the inside water of this state, but does not include a person holding a wholesale fish dealer's license under Section 47.009 of this code.

(11) "Individual bait-shrimp trawl" means a trawl, net, or rig used for the purpose of catching shrimp for one's own personal use.

(12) "Second offense" and "third and subsequent offenses" mean offenses for which convictions have been obtained within three years prior to the date of the offense charged.

(13) "Contiguous zone," means that area of the Gulf of Mexico lying adjacent to and offshore of the jurisdiction of the State of Texas and in which shrimp of the genus Penaeus are found.

(14) "Bait bays" includes major bays, Copano Bay east of a line running from Rattlesnake Point to the northeastern boundary of the Bayside township, Nueces Bay from the bridge at State Highway 181 west to the second overhead power line dissecting the bay, Upper Laguna Madre, Baffin Bay, Alazan Bay, Carlos Bay, Baroom Bay, Lower Laguna Madre, and the Gulf Intracoastal Waterway exclusive of all tributaries.

(15) "Nursery areas" includes tributary bays, bayous, inlets, lakes, and rivers, which are proven to serve as significant growth and development environments for postlarval and juvenile shrimp not including the outside waters, major bays, or bait bays as defined in this section.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1220, ch. 456, Sec. 20(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1297, ch. 600, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 130, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 77.002. LICENSE FEES. (a) License fees provided in this chapter are a privilege tax on catching, buying, selling, unloading, transporting, or handling shrimp within the jurisdiction of this state.

(b) The shrimp marketing account is an account in the general revenue fund to be used by the Department of Agriculture solely for the purpose of the Texas shrimp marketing assistance program established under Subchapter B, Chapter 47, Agriculture Code. The account consists of funds deposited to the account under this section. The account is exempt from the application of Section 11.032 of this code and Section 403.095, Government Code.

(c) Except as provided by Sections 47.021 and 77.049, in addition to fee increases the department is authorized to make under this code, the department shall increase by 10 percent the fee, as of September 1, 2003, for the following licenses and shall deposit the amount of the increase to the credit of the shrimp marketing account:

(1) a wholesale fish dealer's license issued under Section 47.009;

(2) a wholesale truck dealer's fish license issued under Section 47.010;

(3) a retail fish dealer's license issued under Section 47.011;

(4) a retail dealer's truck license issued under Section 47.013;

(5) a commercial bay shrimp boat license issued under Section 77.031; and

(6) a commercial gulf shrimp boat license issued under Section 77.035.

(d) Money in the shrimp marketing account may be used only for implementing, maintaining, and conducting, including hiring program staff employees for, the Texas shrimp marketing assistance program created under Subchapter B, Chapter 47, Agriculture Code. The Department of Agriculture may allocate not more than $100,000 per fiscal year of the money in the account to cover administrative and personnel costs of the Department of Agriculture associated with the program.

(e) The department shall deposit at the end of each quarter to the credit of the shrimp marketing account, fees received under Subsection (c) for use by the Department of Agriculture to conduct and operate the Texas shrimp marketing assistance program created under Subchapter B, Chapter 47, Agriculture Code.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 265, Sec. 8, eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 677, Sec. 6, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 4593), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 77.003. DISPOSITION OF FUNDS. Money received for licenses issued under this chapter or fines for violations of this chapter shall be remitted to the department by the 10th day of the month following the date of collection.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.004. RESEARCH PROGRAM. (a) The department shall conduct continuous research and study of:

(1) the supply, economic value, environment, and reproductive characteristics of the various economically important species of shrimp;

(2) factors affecting the increase or decrease in shrimp stocks in both an annual and long-term cycle;

(3) the use and effectiveness of trawls, nets, and other devices for the taking of shrimp;

(4) industrial and other pollution of the water naturally frequented by shrimp;

(5) statistical information gathered by the department on the marketing, harvesting, processing, and catching of shrimp landed at points in the state;

(6) environmental parameters in the bay and estuary areas that may serve as limiting factors of shrimp population abundance;

(7) other factors that, based on the best scientific information available, may affect the health and well-being of the economically important shrimp resources; and

(8) alternative management measures for shrimp that may be considered for implementation in the management regime.

(b) The research may be conducted by the department or an agency designated by the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 633, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 1985.

Sec. 77.005. STUDY AND REPORT ON SHRIMP INDUSTRY AND RESOURCES. (a) Using the shrimp management plan required by Section 77.007 and the research conducted under Section 77.004, the department shall comprehensively study shrimp resources, including the shrimp population, and the shrimp industry. The study shall analyze:

(1) the status of the shrimp population in coastal water, including the size and projected growth of shrimping beds;

(2) the economic health of the shrimp industry;

(3) the status of conservation measures, including department regulations and license buybacks; and

(4) the status of marine resources and habitats affected by shrimping.

(b) In conducting the study, the department shall solicit and consider input from:

(1) the public;

(2) the shrimp industry;

(3) other businesses affected by the shrimp industry;

(4) any other persons interested in marine resources; and

(5) the comptroller regarding economic data.

(c) The department shall report on the status of the study to:

(1) the commission;

(2) the presiding officer of each house of the legislature; and

(3) the committees of each house of the legislature that have primary oversight jurisdiction over the department.

(d) The department may repeat the study and report as necessary to adequately regulate the shrimp industry and to preserve shrimp resources.

(e) The commission shall base policies and rules relating to shrimping on the results of the most recent study completed under this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 77.007. REGULATION OF CATCHING, POSSESSION, PURCHASE, AND SALE OF SHRIMP. (a) The commission by proclamation may regulate the catching, possession, purchase, and sale of shrimp. A proclamation issued under this section must contain findings by the commission that support the need for the proclamation.

(b) In determining the need for a proclamation under Subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall consider:

(1) measures to prevent overfishing while achieving, on a continuing basis, the optimum yield for the fishery;

(2) measures based on the best scientific information available;

(3) measures to manage shrimp throughout their range;

(4) measures, where practicable, that will promote efficiency in utilizing shrimp resources, except that economic allocation may not be the sole purpose of the measures;

(5) measures, where practicable, that will minimize cost and avoid unnecessary duplication in their administration; and

(6) measures which will enhance enforcement.

(c) A proclamation issued under Subsection (a) of this section may limit the quantity and size of shrimp that may be caught, possessed, sold, or purchased and may prescribe the times, places, conditions, and means and manner of catching shrimp. However, measures dealing with sale and purchase may only be implemented at first sale or exchange transaction.

(d) A proclamation of the commission under this section prevails over:

(1) any conflicting provision of this chapter to the extent of the conflict; and

(2) a proclamation of the commission issued under the Wildlife Conservation Act of 1983 (Chapter 61 of this code).

(e) A person who violates a proclamation issued under Subsection (a) of this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is punishable as provided by Subsection (a) of Section 77.020 of this code.

(f) The commission shall make no proclamation under this chapter until it has approved and adopted a shrimp management plan and economic impact analysis prepared by the department as provided in Section 77.004 and unless such proclamation is shown to be consistent with the shrimp management plan.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 633, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO SHRIMPING

Sec. 77.011. LICENSE REQUIREMENT. No person may operate in the coastal water without obtaining the appropriate license, if required, as prescribed in this chapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.014. METHOD OF TAKING COUNT. (a) An authorized employee of the department shall take the count of shrimp in the presence of the person possessing the shrimp.

(b) The employee shall select a minimum of three representative samples for each 1,000 pounds or fraction of 1,000 pounds of headless or heads-on shrimp being sampled.

(c) Each sample must weigh five pounds after draining at least three minutes.

(d) The count per pound for the sample is determined by dividing the number of specimens in the sample by five.

(e) The average count per pound for the entire quantity being sampled is determined by totalling the count per pound for each sample and dividing that total by the number of samples.

(f) The average count per pound as determined under this section is prima facie evidence of the average count per pound of the shrimp in the entire cargo or quantity of shrimp sampled.

(g) Headless and heads-on shrimp shall be sampled, weighed, and counted separately.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.015. GRADATION AND PROCESSING. Shrimp found to be of legal size under this chapter may subsequently be graded for size for packaging, processing, or sale.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.0191. RETENTION OF REDFISH, SPECKLED SEA TROUT, AND LIGHTNING WHELKS. (a) No person who is using a trawl for the purpose of taking shrimp may retain a redfish, speckled sea trout, or lightning whelk, also known as Busycon perversum pulleyi, caught in the trawl.

(b) No person may retain a redfish, speckled sea trout, or lightning whelk if the person is on board a boat licensed under this chapter and if there is a shrimp trawl on board the boat.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3818, ch. 592, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 524, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 77.020. PENALTY. (a) A person who violates a provision of this chapter except Section 77.024 or 77.061(a)(1) or who violates a regulation adopted under this chapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant that the person has been convicted once within five years before the trial date of a violation of a provision of this chapter except Section 77.024 or 77.061(a)(1), or of a regulation adopted under this chapter, the person is guilty of a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(c) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant that the person has been convicted two or more times within five years before the trial date of a violation of a provision of this chapter except Section 77.024 or 77.061(a)(1), or of a regulation adopted under this chapter, the person is guilty of a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(d) Section 12.109 and Subchapter D, Chapter 12, do not apply to a violation of a rule adopted under this chapter related to the display of a commercial shrimp boat license or a commercial shrimp boat's documentation or registration number if another violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter does not exist at the time of the violation.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1465, ch. 641, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2166, ch. 506, Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 116, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1180, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 77.021. SEPARATE OFFENSE. Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.022. RESPONSIBILITY FOR VIOLATION. (a) When a vessel is involved in a violation of this chapter, the captain of the vessel shall be considered primarily responsible for the violation. A member of the crew of a vessel shall not be guilty of a violation unless it also be charged that the member of the crew acted in violation of the orders of the captain of the vessel.

(b) The owner of a vessel involved in a violation of this chapter may not be found guilty of the violation unless it is charged and proved that the owner knowingly directed, authorized, permitted, agreed to, aided, or acquiesced in the violation.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1213, ch. 456, Sec. 13(i), eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.024. OPERATION WITHOUT LICENSE. No person whose license has been forfeited may do business without a new license or possess another license for the period of forfeiture.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 86, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 77.025. PERIOD OF LIMITATION. Except as provided in Article 12.05, Code of Criminal Procedure, 1965, as amended, an indictment or information for a violation of this chapter may be presented within one year after the date of the commission of the offense and not afterward.

Added by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1213, ch. 456, Sec. 13(j), eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

SUBCHAPTER C. SHRIMP LICENSES

Sec. 77.031. COMMERCIAL BAY SHRIMP BOAT LICENSE. (a) No person may operate a commercial bay shrimp boat for the purpose of catching or assisting in catching shrimp and other edible aquatic products from the inside water unless the owner has obtained a commercial bay shrimp boat license.

(b) The fee for a commercial bay shrimp boat license is $170 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. The executive director may set a fee lower than $170 for licenses issued from December 16, 1993, through August 31, 1994, and which expire on August 31, 1994.

(c) An applicant for a commercial bay shrimp boat license must submit to the department an affidavit that the applicant intends to derive the major portion of his livelihood from the commercial fishery and that he will maintain adequate facilities to conduct the business.

(d) The fee for a commercial bay shrimp boat license for a boat that is not numbered under Chapter 31 of this code or does not have a certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard that lists an address in Texas for the boat owner or other criteria established by the commission is $500 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1213, ch. 456, Sec. 13(g), eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2012, ch. 789, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1338, ch. 277, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 68, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 633, Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 25, eff. Dec. 16, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 72, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 77.033. COMMERCIAL BAIT-SHRIMP BOAT LICENSE. (a) No person may operate a commercial bait-shrimp boat for the purpose of catching or assisting in catching shrimp for use as bait only and other edible aquatic products from the inside water unless the owner of the boat has obtained a commercial bait-shrimp boat license.

(b) The fee for a commercial bait-shrimp boat license is $170 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) The fee for a commercial bait-shrimp boat license for a boat that is not numbered under Chapter 31 of this code or does not have a certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard that lists an address in Texas for the boat owner or other criteria established by the commission is $500 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1338, ch. 277, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 69, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 633, Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 73, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 77.034. COMMERCIAL GULF SHRIMP UNLOADING LICENSE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), no person may unload or allow to be unloaded at a port or point in this state shrimp or other aquatic products caught or taken from the outside water or from salt water outside the state without having been previously unloaded in some other state or foreign country, unless the person has obtained:

(1) a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license; and

(2) a federal commercial vessel permit for gulf shrimp from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.

(b) A person holding a valid resident or nonresident commercial gulf shrimp boat license is exempt from the requirement to hold a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license.

(c) A vessel operating under a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license must make a nonstop progression through outside waters to a place of unloading. The commission shall adopt rules for the requirements of trawl gear storage for a vessel who holds a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license while that vessel is making a nonstop progression through outside waters to a place of unloading.

(d) The fee for a commercial gulf shrimp unloading license is $1485, or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. Revenue from the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account established under Section 11.032.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (H.B. 1260), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1173 (H.B. 3317), Sec. 17(a), eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 77.035. COMMERCIAL GULF SHRIMP BOAT LICENSE. (a) Except as permitted under Section 77.034, no person may operate a commercial gulf shrimp boat for catching or assisting in catching shrimp and other edible aquatic products from the outside water, or have on board a boat, or unload, or allow to be unloaded at a port or point in this state, shrimp and other edible aquatic products caught or taken from the outside water or from salt water outside the state without having been previously unloaded in some other state or foreign country, unless the owner of the boat has obtained a commercial gulf shrimp boat license.

(b) The fee for a commercial gulf shrimp boat license is $250 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) The fee for a commercial gulf shrimp boat license for a boat that is not numbered under Chapter 31 of this code or does not have a certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard that lists an address in Texas for the boat owner or other criteria established by the commission is $1,000 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1213, ch. 456, Sec. 13(h), eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1338, ch. 277, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 70, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 633, Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 74, eff. June 16, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (H.B. 1260), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 77.0351. COMMERCIAL SHRIMP BOAT CAPTAIN'S LICENSE. (a) No captain of a licensed commercial shrimp boat may operate a licensed commercial shrimp boat while catching or attempting to catch shrimp from the public water of this state or unloading or attempting to unload in this state shrimp and other aquatic products taken from saltwater outside this state for pay or for purposes of sale, unless the person holds a commercial shrimp boat captain's license issued by the department.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the fee for a resident commercial shrimp boat captain's license shall be no less than $25 and no more than $50.

(c) The fee for a nonresident commercial shrimp boat captain's license is $100 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(d) In this section, "resident" and "nonresident" have the meanings assigned by Section 47.001.

(e) Subchapter D, Chapter 12, does not apply to a violation of this section if another violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter does not exist at the time of the violation.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1180, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 77.0352. SALE OF CATCH. (a) The holder of a commercial shrimp boat license or commercial gulf shrimp unloading license may sell only the catch of shrimp from the vessel to which the commercial shrimp boat license or commercial gulf shrimp unloading license applies.

(b) The holder of a commercial shrimp boat license or commercial gulf shrimp unloading license may sell aquatic products other than shrimp if those aquatic products:

(1) were taken incidental to lawful shrimping on the vessel to which the commercial shrimp boat license or commercial gulf shrimp unloading license applies; and

(2) comply with all applicable provisions of this code or commission regulations.

(c) The holder of a commercial shrimp boat captain's license may sell only:

(1) the catch of shrimp from the vessel being operated by that license holder; and

(2) aquatic products other than shrimp if those aquatic products:

(A) were taken incidental to lawful shrimping; and

(B) comply with all applicable provisions of this code or commission regulations.

(d) Subsection (c) does not authorize the sale of shrimp or other aquatic products without the consent of the owner of the vessel used to make the catch.

(e) No person, including a crew member of a licensed commercial shrimp boat, may sell the catch of shrimp or other aquatic products taken incidental to the legal shrimping operation, except as provided by this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (H.B. 1260), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 77.036. OFFICIAL REGISTRATION. (a) An applicant for a commercial shrimp boat license, which is not a renewal of the previous year's license, issued under this subchapter must submit to the department the boat's United States Coast Guard certificate of documentation or the Texas certificate of number for a vessel or other state's certificate of number for a motorboat.

(b) The certificate of license issued by the department for a commercial shrimp boat must contain the name of the boat if the boat is registered with the United States Coast Guard and the number appearing on the United States Coast Guard certificate of documentation or the Texas or other state's certificate of number.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 450, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 77.0361. LICENSE EXPIRATIONS AND TRANSFERS. (a) All licenses issued under the authority of Chapter 77 of this code are valid only during the yearly period for which they are issued without regard to the date on which the licenses are acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a license fee for a license issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this chapter and provide for a license term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

(b) All licenses issued under the authority of this chapter may not be transferred to another person or vessel except as provided by Subsection (c) or by Section 77.113. A license issued under the authority of Section 77.043 in the name of a business remains valid for the business location specified on the license if a change of ownership or business name occurs. A license issued under the authority of Section 77.035 may be transferred to another vessel or to the new owner of the same vessel.

(c) The commission, by regulation, may prescribe requirements necessary for license transfers and may prescribe, by regulation, forms to be used and fees to be charged for transfers of licenses in this chapter, for duplicate license plates, or for duplicate or replacement licenses.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 3, eff. June 8, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 75, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 117, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 77.037. TRANSFER OF LICENSE. A commercial gulf shrimp boat license issued under this subchapter may be transferred on the application of the licensee from a boat that has been destroyed or lost to a boat acquired by the licensee as a replacement. The commission, by regulation, may prescribe requirements necessary to clarify license transfer procedures and may prescribe, by regulation, forms to be used and fees to be charged for transfer of licenses authorized by this subsection.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 118, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 77.039. LICENSE DESIGN. (a) A commercial shrimp boat license or commercial gulf shrimp unloading license issued under this subchapter must be a sign or emblem at least 32 square inches in size and be constructed of a durable material.

(b) The character and design of each class of commercial shrimp boat license issued under this subchapter must be distinguishable.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 107 (S.B. 454), Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (H.B. 1260), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 77.040. OTHER LICENSES REQUIRED. (a) A person holding a commercial shrimp boat license under this subchapter is not required to obtain a commercial fishing boat license under Section 47.007 of this code.

(b) The captain of a commercial shrimp boat who holds a commercial shrimp boat captain's license and each paid member of the crew of a boat having a commercial shrimp boat license issued under this subchapter are not required to have a general commercial fisherman's license issued under Section 47.002 of this code, a commercial finfish fisherman's license issued under Section 47.003 of this code, or a bait dealer's license issued under Section 47.014 of this code to catch and unload aquatic products lawfully taken incidental to lawful shrimping.

(c) The captain and each crew member of a licensed commercial shrimp boat must possess and produce on request to any enforcement officer proof of the person's identity.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 550, ch. 260, art. 4, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1399, ch. 623, Sec. 9, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 862, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 77.043. BAIT-SHRIMP DEALER LICENSE. (a) No person may engage in business as a bait-shrimp dealer unless he has obtained a bait-shrimp dealer's license from the department for each bait stand or place of business he maintains.

(b) The fee for a bait-shrimp dealer's license is $60 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) A bait-shrimp dealer's license expires August 31 following the date of issuance.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1339, ch. 277, Sec. 52, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 77.044. ISSUANCE OF BAIT-SHRIMP DEALER'S LICENSE. (a) The department shall issue a bait-shrimp dealer's license only after it has determined that the applicant for the license is a bona fide bait-shrimp dealer.

(b) A bait-shrimp dealer's license may not be held by a person who also holds a wholesale fish dealer's license.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 119, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 77.045. RIGHTS AND DUTIES OF BAIT-SHRIMP DEALER. (a) The holder of a bait-shrimp dealer's license may sell, purchase, and handle shrimp, minnows, fish, and other forms of aquatic life for sale or resale for fish bait purposes in the coastal counties of this state.

(b) The holder of a bait-shrimp dealer's license is not required to obtain a bait dealer's license issued under Section 47.014 of this code unless he engages in the business in a county other than a coastal county.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2693, ch. 730, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2692, ch. 730, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Sec. 77.046. EXEMPTIONS FROM BAIT-SHRIMP DEALER'S LICENSE. A bait-shrimp dealer's license is not required for:

(1) grocery stores in coastal counties which do not unload or purchase shrimp directly from commercial bait-shrimp boats;

(2) bait dealers in coastal counties who do not sell or offer for sale or handle shrimp for sale or resale for bait purposes, but these dealers must have a bait-dealer's license issued under Section 47.014 of this code.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.048. INDIVIDUAL BAIT-SHRIMP TRAWL LICENSE. (a) No person may possess or have on board a boat in coastal water an individual bait-shrimp trawl unless the owner of the trawl has obtained an individual bait-shrimp trawl license from the department.

(b) The fee for the individual bait-shrimp trawl license is $15 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) The individual bait-shrimp trawl license expires on August 31 following the date of issuance.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1339, ch. 277, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 73, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 633, Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER D. SHRIMPING IN OUTSIDE WATER

Sec. 77.061. GENERAL CLOSED SEASON. (a) Except as specifically provided in this subchapter, no person may catch shrimp in outside water:

(1) from June 1 to July 15, both dates inclusive, or during a period provided under Section 77.062 of this code, as applicable; or

(2) extending from the coastline of Texas up to and including seven fathoms in depth from December 16 of each year to February 1 of the following year, both dates inclusive, unless taking sea bobs.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subchapter E, Chapter 12, of this code, a person who violates Subdivision (1) of Subsection (a) of this section or Section 77.024 of this code commits an offense and on conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $2,500 nor more than $5,000, by confinement in the county jail for not less than six months nor more than one year, or by both.

(c) Except as provided in this section, the presence of a shrimp trawl (excluding doors) not stored within the confines of the hull of a vessel in outside water during the closed period provided by Subdivision (1) of Subsection (a) of this section is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section.

(d) Subsection (c) of this section does not apply to a licensed commercial gulf shrimp boat within one-fourth mile of jetties when the vessel is in direct transit to open water to catch white shrimp as provided in Section 77.065, Parks and Wildlife Code, as amended.

(e) A commercial shrimp boat operating in the outside water during the closed season as provided by Subdivision (1) of Subsection (a) of this section shall display its documentation number issued by the United States Coast Guard for documented vessels or a registration number issued by a state on the port and starboard sides of the deckhouse or hull and on an appropriate weather deck so as to be clearly visible from enforcement vessels and aircraft. This number shall be permanently attached or painted on the vessel in block Arabic numerals in contrasting color to the background and at least 18 inches in height on vessels over 65 feet in length or at least 10 inches in height for all other vessels.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1220, ch. 456, Sec. 20(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2165, ch. 506, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 87, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 77.062. CHANGE IN GENERAL CLOSED SEASON. Based on sound biological data, the commission may change the opening and closing dates of the June 1 to July 15 closed season to provide for an earlier, later, or longer season not to exceed 60 days. The commission may change the closing date with 72 hours public notice and may reopen the season with 24 hours notice. The commission may delegate to the director the duties and responsibilities of opening and closing the shrimping season under this section.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1220, ch. 456, Sec. 20(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 77.063. GENERAL LIMITATION ON NETS. (a) Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 130, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

(b) When restrictions are imposed on either or both the size and number of main trawls, no person may use a try net in outside water exceeding 21 feet in width as measured along an uninterrupted corkline from leading tip of door to leading tip of door and having doors or boards that exceed 450 square inches each or a beam trawl exceeding 10 feet in width as measured along the beam of a beam trawl in its fully extended position.

(c) This section does not apply to the taking of sea bobs.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1092, ch. 511, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1979; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 130, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 77.071. REGULATIONS IN CONTIGUOUS ZONE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 217, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

(b) The department may negotiate reciprocal agreements with another state with respect to the application of one state's shrimping regulations in its contiguous zone to citizens of the other state.

Added by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1221, ch. 456, Sec. 20(f), eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 217, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 77.072. SHRIMP SIZE EXCEPTION. Minimum size restrictions as provided in Chapter 77, Parks and Wildlife Code, as amended, do not apply to shrimp taken from outside waters when:

(1) the Gulf of Mexico Fishery Management Council's Fishery Management Plan for the Shrimp Fishery of the Gulf of Mexico is in effect; and

(2) such plan as described in Subsection (a) of this section restricts the taking of shrimp in the Fishery Conservation Zone contiguous to the outside waters of Texas, to conform with the Texas closed Gulf season as defined in Sections 77.061(1) and 77.062 of this code.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 452, ch. 187, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1981.

SUBCHAPTER F. BAY SHRIMP LICENSE MANAGEMENT

Sec. 77.111. SHRIMP LICENSE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM. For the purposes of promoting efficiency and economic stability in the shrimping industry and of conserving economically important shrimp resources, the department shall implement a shrimp license management program in accordance with the shrimp management plan adopted by the commission under Section 77.007 and as prescribed by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.112. ISSUANCE AND RENEWAL OF COMMERCIAL BAY AND BAIT SHRIMP BOAT LICENSES. (a) After August 31, 1995, the department may not issue a new commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license unless the person seeking to obtain the license documents to the satisfaction of the department that the vessel for which the license is sought:

(1) is owned by the person;

(2) was under construction and at least 50 percent completed on April 1, 1995; and

(3) is intended to be licensed and used as a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat.

(b) For the license year ending August 31, 1996, the department may renew a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license only if the person seeking renewal of the license:

(1) owns the commercial bay or bait shrimp boat for which the license renewal is sought; and

(2) held the license to be renewed on April 1, 1995, or, after that date, obtained the license to be renewed by a transfer authorized by Section 77.113.

(c) After August 31, 1996, the commission may renew a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license only if the person seeking to renew the license:

(1) owns the commercial bay or bait shrimp boat for which the license renewal is sought; and

(2) held the license to be renewed during the preceding license year.

(d) An applicant for a new or renewed commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license for a vessel that is required by United States Coast Guard rules to be documented by the United States Coast Guard must submit to the department with the license application the United States Coast Guard certificate of documentation for the vessel.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.113. LICENSE TRANSFER. (a) Except as provided by this section, a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license may not be transferred from one person to another before September 1, 1999.

(b) A commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license may be transferred at any time, by sale or otherwise:

(1) between holders of a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license;

(2) between a holder of a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license and a historical shrimp boat captain as defined by the shrimp license management review board and approved by the executive director; or

(3) to an heir or devisee of the deceased holder of the commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license, but only if the heir or devisee is a person who in the absence of a will would be entitled to all or a portion of the deceased's property.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.114. LIMIT ON NUMBER OF LICENSES HELD; DESIGNATED LICENSE HOLDER. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), no person may hold or directly or indirectly control more than four commercial bay and four commercial bait shrimp boat licenses.

(b) A person who qualifies to renew a license under Section 77.112 on September 1, 1995, may hold each license renewed and after that date may retain and renew the licenses until the licenses are transferred, not renewed, or revoked. A person may not hold or renew more than four commercial bay and four commercial bait shrimp boat licenses under this subsection after August 31, 2002.

(c) A commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license must be issued to an individual. A person other than an individual who wishes to retain or seeks to renew a license of either type must designate an individual to whom the license will be issued.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.115. TRANSFER FEE. The commission may set a fee for the transfer of a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license. The amount of the transfer fee may not exceed the amount of the license fee for the license being transferred.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.116. LENGTH AND ENGINE LIMITS; VESSEL UPGRADE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a vessel licensed as a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat may not:

(1) have an engine that is rated by the manufacturer of the engine at more than 400 horsepower; or

(2) exceed 60 feet in length.

(b) A vessel licensed as a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat may not be lengthened or have the engine horsepower increased more than once after September 1, 1995.

(c) A vessel may not be lengthened by more than 15 percent of the vessel's length.

(d) The license for a vessel that on September 1, 1995, is licensed as a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat and exceeds the length or horsepower limit set by Subsection (a) may be renewed, but the vessel may not be lengthened or have the horsepower of the vessel increased. If the vessel is replaced, the replacement vessel must meet the engine and length requirements described in Subsection (a).

(e) For purposes of this section, vessel length shall be determined according to United States Coast Guard specifications in effect on September 1, 1995.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.117. LICENSE SUSPENSION AND REVOCATION. (a) The executive director, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, may suspend a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license if the license holder or any other operator of the licensed vessel is convicted of one or more flagrant offenses totalling three flagrant offenses for the licensed vessel. The suspension may be for:

(1) six months, if:

(A) the date of each offense is within a 24-consecutive-month period beginning not earlier than September 1, 1995; and

(B) the license holder has not previously had a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license suspended under this section; or

(2) 12 months, if the date of each offense is within a 24-consecutive-month period and the license holder has previously had a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license suspended under this section.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a license suspension under this section does not affect the license holder's eligibility to renew the license after the suspension expires.

(c) The executive director, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, may permanently revoke a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license if:

(1) the license holder has previously had a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license suspended twice under this section;

(2) the license holder or any other operator of the licensed vessel is convicted of one or more flagrant offenses totalling three flagrant offenses for the licensed vessel; and

(3) the date of each offense is in a 24-consecutive-month period beginning not earlier than the date of the most recent previous suspension under this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, a flagrant offense includes:

(1) trawling in a nursery area in violation of this code or of a proclamation of the commission issued under this code;

(2) shrimping longer than 30 minutes before or 30 minutes after legal shrimping hours prescribed by this code or by a proclamation of the commission issued under this code;

(3) exceeding possession limits, in violation of this code or of a proclamation of the commission issued under this code, by 100 or more pounds;

(4) exceeding legal net size, in violation of this code or of a proclamation of the commission issued under this code, by five feet or more; or

(5) falsifying information required by this subchapter or a commission rule adopted under this subchapter for the issuance of a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license.

(e) The same flagrant offense may not be counted for more than one suspension under this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.118. SHRIMP LICENSE MANAGEMENT REVIEW BOARD. (a) The holders of commercial bay and bait shrimp boat licenses shall elect a shrimp license management review board of nine members.

(b) A member of the review board must be a holder of a commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license.

(c) The nine members of the review board must be selected to reflect the following geographical distribution according to the county of residence specified on the member's commercial bay or bait shrimp boat license:

(1) one member representing Orange, Jefferson, Chambers, and Harris counties;

(2) two members representing Galveston County;

(3) two members representing Brazoria and Matagorda counties;

(4) three members representing Calhoun, Aransas, Nueces, San Patricio, and Refugio counties; and

(5) one member representing Kleberg, Cameron, and Willacy counties.

(d) The review board shall advise the commission and department and make recommendations concerning the administrative aspects of the shrimp license management program, including hardship and appeal cases concerning eligibility, license transfer, license renewal, license suspension, license revocation, and vessel length and engine changes.

(e) The executive director shall adopt procedures for the election and operation of the review board. The executive director shall solicit and consider recommendations from the commercial bay and bait shrimp boat license holders regarding the procedures.

(f) The review board is not subject to Article 6252-33, Revised Statutes.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.119. LICENSE BUYBACK PROGRAM. (a) The department shall implement a license buyback program as part of the shrimp license management program established by this subchapter.

(b) The commission by rule may establish criteria, using reasonable classifications, by which the department selects licenses to be purchased. The commission may delegate to the executive director, for purposes of this section only, the authority to develop the criteria through rulemaking procedures, but the commission by order must finally adopt the rules establishing the criteria. The commission or executive director shall consult with the shrimp license management review board concerning establishment of the criteria.

(c) The commission shall retire each license purchased under the license buyback program until the commission finds that management of the shrimp fishery allows reissue of those licenses through auction or lottery.

(d) A person whose license is selected by the department to be purchased under the license buyback program shall be required to execute a contract that includes the following terms:

"Section 40.251, Natural Resources Code, provides that any person who intentionally leaves, abandons, or maintains any vessel in a wrecked, derelict, or substantially dismantled condition in violation of Section 40.108, Natural Resources Code, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Further, a person who leaves, abandons, or maintains a derelict vessel in violation of Section 40.108, Natural Resources Code, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100 or more than $10,000 per violation for each day of violation, not to exceed a maximum of $125,000 pursuant to Section 40.251(f), Natural Resources Code. I agree not to abandon or dispose of any vessel in violation of state law. I further acknowledge that money paid to me under the license buyback program may be forfeited to the coastal protection fund established by Section 40.151, Natural Resources Code, if the commissioner of the General Land Office finds that the vessel to which the license applied was abandoned in violation of Section 40.108, Natural Resources Code."

(e) The commissioner of the General Land Office may order the forfeiture of any money paid to a person under the license buyback program if the commissioner finds that the vessel to which the license applied was abandoned by the person in violation of Section 40.108, Natural Resources Code. Any money forfeited under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the coastal protection fund established by Section 40.151, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 216 (H.B. 2096), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 77.121. PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION; RULES. (a) The executive director shall establish administrative procedures to carry out the requirements of this subchapter.

(b) The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.122. REPORT TO LEGISLATURE. Not later than January 1, 1999, the department shall report to the governor and each member of the legislature an overview of the administration and status of the shrimp license management program, including the biological, sociological, and economic effects of the program.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

Sec. 77.123. PREVAILING AUTHORITY. A proclamation of the commission under this subchapter prevails over any conflicting provision of this chapter to the extent of the conflict.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER G. GULF SHRIMP LICENSE MORATORIUM

Sec. 77.151. GULF SHRIMP LICENSE MORATORIUM PROGRAM. The department shall implement a gulf shrimp license moratorium program to promote efficiency and economic stability in the gulf shrimping industry.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 107 (S.B. 454), Sec. 3, eff. May 20, 2005.

Sec. 77.152. ISSUANCE AND RENEWAL OF COMMERCIAL GULF SHRIMP BOAT LICENSES. (a) After August 31, 2005, the department may not issue or renew a commercial gulf shrimp boat license unless the person seeking to obtain or renew the license documents to the satisfaction of the department that the vessel for which the license is sought:

(1) is owned by the person;

(2) was licensed as a gulf shrimp boat on the day the renewal was sought or at the end of the licensing period immediately preceding the period for which the license is sought; and

(3) is intended to be licensed and used as a commercial gulf shrimp boat.

(b) An applicant for a new or renewed commercial gulf shrimp boat license for a vessel must submit to the department with the license application:

(1) the United States Coast Guard certificate of documentation for the vessel, if the vessel is required by United States Coast Guard rules to be documented; and

(2) the certificate of number for the vessel as required by Chapter 31.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 107 (S.B. 454), Sec. 3, eff. May 20, 2005.

Sec. 77.153. GULF SHRIMP LICENSE MORATORIUM REVIEW BOARD. (a) The holders of commercial gulf shrimp boat licenses shall elect a gulf shrimp license moratorium review board of nine members.

(b) A member of the review board must be a holder of a commercial gulf shrimp boat license.

(c) The nine members of the review board must be selected to reflect the following geographical distribution according to the county of residence specified on the member's commercial gulf shrimp boat license:

(1) two members representing Orange, Jefferson, Chambers, and Harris Counties;

(2) one member representing Galveston County;

(3) two members representing Brazoria and Matagorda Counties;

(4) two members representing Calhoun, Aransas, Nueces, San Patricio, and Refugio Counties; and

(5) two members representing Kleberg, Cameron, and Willacy Counties.

(d) The review board shall advise the commission and department and make recommendations concerning the administrative aspects of the gulf shrimp license moratorium program, including hardship and appeal cases concerning eligibility.

(e) The executive director shall adopt procedures for the election and operation of the review board. The executive director shall solicit and consider recommendations from the commercial gulf shrimp boat license holders regarding the procedures and the continued need for the board.

(f) The review board is not subject to Chapter 2110, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 107 (S.B. 454), Sec. 3, eff. May 20, 2005.

Sec. 77.154. PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION; RULES. (a) The executive director shall establish administrative procedures to carry out the requirements of this subchapter.

(b) The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the program established under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 107 (S.B. 454), Sec. 3, eff. May 20, 2005.